Hawaii statutes.
§323D-13 Statewide health coordinating
council. (a) There is established a statewide health coordinating council
which shall be advisory to the state agency and the membership of which as
appointed by the governor shall not exceed twenty members.

(b) The members of the statewide council shall
be appointed by the governor in accordance with section 26-34, provided that a
nonvoting, ex officio member who is the representative of the Veterans'
Administration shall be designated by the Veterans' Administration. The
membership of the statewide council shall be broadly representative of the age,
sex, ethnic, income, and other groups that make up the population of the State
and shall include representation from the subarea councils, business, labor,
and health care providers. A majority but not more than eleven of the members
shall be consumers of health care who are not also providers of health care.

(c) The statewide council shall select a
chairperson from among its members. The members of the statewide council shall
not be compensated but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties.

(d) The number of members necessary to
constitute a quorum to do business shall consist of a majority of all members
who have accepted nomination to the council, and have been confirmed and
qualified as members of the council. When a quorum is in attendance, the
concurrence of a majority of the members in attendance shall make any action of
the council valid.

(e) No member of the statewide council shall,
in the exercise of any function of the statewide council described in section
323D-14(3), vote on any matter before the statewide council respecting any
individual or entity with which the member has or, within the twelve months preceding
the vote, had any substantial ownership, employment, medical staff, fiduciary,
contractual, creditor, or consultative relationship. The statewide council
shall require each of its members who has or has had such a relationship with
an individual or entity involved in any matter before the statewide council to
make a written disclosure of the relationship before any action is taken by the
statewide council with respect to the matter in the exercise of any function
described in section 323D-14 and to make the relationship public in any meeting
in which the action is to be taken. [L 1975, c 159, pt of §2; am L 1976, c 152,
§4; am L 1977, c 178, pt of §2; am L 1978, c 129, §3; am L 1980, c 75, §4; am L
1984, c 267, §5]

Revision Note

In subsection (e), section "323D-14(3)" substituted
for "323D-14(5)".

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next